Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 42 Abandoned Motor Vehicles

31-42-1.
Definitions.

“Abandoned motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is inoperable and over eight (8) years old and is left unattended on public property for more than forty-eight (48) hours, or a motor vehicle that has remained illegally on public property for a period of more than three (3) days, or a motor vehicle that has remained on private property without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property for more than three (3) days.

“Abandoned motor vehicle of no value” means a motor vehicle that is inoperable and over ten (10) years old and is left unattended on public property for more than forty-eight (48) hours, or a motor vehicle that has remained illegally on public property for a period of more than three (3) days, or a motor vehicle that has remained on private property without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property for more than three (3) days, and meets the following criteria:

The vehicle has no evidence of current registration in or upon the vehicle;

The vehicle has a fair market value of five hundred dollars ($500) or less; and

The vehicle does not have a valid inspection sticker.

“Demolisher” means any person whose business is to convert a motor vehicle into processed scrap or scrap metal, or otherwise to wreck or dismantle motor vehicles.

“Police department” means the police department of a city or town. For the purposes of this section “police department” shall also include the Rhode Island airport corporation police department.

“Unlicensed junkyards” means any establishment or premises which are used for the storing, keeping or accumulation of one or more inoperable, worn out, junked, or otherwise discarded motor vehicles, which establishment or premises do not have a license as an auto wrecking and salvage yard.

“Vehicle survey report” means a report printed in the following form:

FORM

Click to view

Display Image

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 434, § 1.

31-42-2.
Authority to take possession of abandoned motor vehicles and abandoned motor vehicles of no value.

A police department may, upon completion of a vehicle survey report, take into custody any motor vehicle found abandoned on public or private property. A police department may employ its own personnel, equipment, and facilities or authorize persons, equipment, and facilities for the purpose of removing, preserving and storing abandoned motor vehicles.

The police shall post or attach to the vehicle, forty-eight (48) hours prior to towing, a notification of an abandoned vehicle indicating the vehicle will be towed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 191, § 1.

31-42-3.
Notification of owner and lienholders.

A police department which takes into custody an abandoned motor vehicle shall notify within fifteen (15) days of it, by registered mail, return receipt requested, the last known registered owner of the motor vehicle and all lienholders of record that the vehicle has been taken into custody. The notice shall describe the year, make, model, and serial number of the abandoned motor vehicle The notice shall set forth the location of the facility where the motor vehicle is being held, inform the owner and any lienholders of their right to reclaim the motor vehicle within three (3) weeks after the date of the notice, upon payment of all towing, preservation, and storage charges resulting from placing the vehicle in custody, and state that the failure of the owner or lienholders to exercise their right to reclaim the vehicle within the time provided shall be deemed a waiver by the owner and all lienholders of all right, title, and interest in the vehicle and consent to the sale of the abandoned motor vehicle at a public auction.

If the identity of the last registered owner cannot be determined, or if the registration contains no address for the owner; or if it is impossible to determine with reasonable certainty the identity and addresses of all lienholders, notice by one publication in one newspaper of general circulation in the area where the motor vehicle was abandoned shall be sufficient to meet all requirements of notice pursuant to this chapter. The notice by publication can contain multiple listings of abandoned vehicles. The notice shall be within the time requirements prescribed for notice by registered mail and shall have the same contents required for a notice by registered mail.

The consequences and effect of failure to reclaim an abandoned motor vehicle shall be as set forth in a valid notice given pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1.

31-42-3.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988 ch. 603, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 2, effective July 12, 1994.

31-42-4.
Auction of abandoned motor vehicles.

If an abandoned motor vehicle has not been reclaimed as provided for in §

31-42-3

, the police department shall sell the abandoned motor vehicle at a public auction. The purchaser of the motor vehicle shall take title to the motor vehicle free and clear of all liens and claims of ownership, shall receive a sales receipt and bill of sale from the police department, and shall be entitled to register the purchased vehicle. The sales receipt at a sale shall be sufficient title only for purposes of transferring the vehicle to a demolisher for demolition, wrecking, or dismantling, and, in that case no further registration of the vehicle shall be necessary.

From the proceeds of the sale of an abandoned motor vehicle, the police department shall reimburse itself for the expenses of the auction, the costs of towing, preserving, and storing the vehicle which resulted from placing the abandoned motor vehicle in custody, and all notices and publication costs incurred pursuant to §

31-42-3

. Any remainder from the proceeds of a sale shall be held for the owner of the vehicle or entitled lienholder for ninety (90) days, and then shall be deposited in a special abandoned motor vehicle fund which shall remain available for the payment of auction, towing, preserving, storage, and all notice and publication costs which result from placing other abandoned vehicles in custody, whenever the proceeds from a sale of the other abandoned motor vehicles are insufficient to meet these expenses and costs.

Whenever the chief finance officer of the city or town finds that moneys in the abandoned motor vehicle fund are in excess of reserves likely to be needed, he or she may transfer the excess to the general fund. But in the event there are additional claims against the abandoned motor vehicle fund, if the abandoned motor vehicle fund is temporarily exhausted, these claims shall be met from the general fund to the limit of any transfers previously made to it pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1.

31-42-5.
Garage keepers and abandoned motor vehicles.

Any motor vehicle left for more than ten (10) days in a garage operated for commercial purposes after notice by registered mail, return receipt requested to the owner to pick up the vehicle, or for more than ten (10) days after the period when, pursuant to contract, the vehicle was to remain on the premises, and any motor vehicle left for more than ten (10) days in the garage by someone other than the registered owner or left by a person authorized to have possession of the motor vehicle, shall be deemed an abandoned vehicle and shall be reported by the garage keeper to the police department. Any garage keeper who fails to report the possession of the vehicle within ten (10) days after it becomes abandoned within the meaning of this section shall no longer have any claim for storage of the vehicle.

All abandoned vehicles left in garages may be taken into custody by the police department and sold in accordance with the procedures set forth in this chapter unless the motor vehicle is reclaimed and the garage keeper is paid. The proceeds of the sale shall be first applied to the garage keepers’ charges for storage and any surplus proceeds shall be distributed in accordance with §

31-42-4

. Except for the termination of a claim for storage for failure to report an abandoned motor vehicle, nothing in this section shall be construed to impair any lien of a garage keeper under the laws of this state, or the right of a lienholder to foreclose.

For the purposes of this section, “garage keeper” means any operator of a parking place establishment or motor vehicle storage facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1.

31-42-6.
Unlicensed junkyards.

When the director of the department of environmental management determines that an unlicensed junkyard exists, he or she may order the demolition and removal of the junked motor vehicles which are contained on the unlicensed premises. Notice of the order shall be sent by ordinary mail to the last and usual place of abode of the owner of the land where the unlicensed junkyard exists to demolish and remove the junked motor vehicles within a prescribed time (not to exceed three (3) months). If the demolition and removal of the junked motor vehicles does not occur within the time specified in the order, the director of the department of environmental management may then enter upon the premises or establishment and demolish and remove the junked motor vehicles without further notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1.

31-42-7.
Disposal to demolishers.

Any person, firm, corporation, or unit of government upon whose property or in whose possession is found any abandoned motor vehicle, or any person being the owner of a motor vehicle whose registration is faulty, lost, or destroyed may apply to the police department of the jurisdiction in which the vehicle is situated for authority to sell, give away, or dispose of the vehicle to a demolisher.

The application shall set out the name and address of the applicant, the year, make, model, and serial number of the motor vehicle, if ascertainable, together with any other identifying features, and shall contain a concise statement of the facts surrounding the abandonment, or that the registration of the motor vehicle is lost or destroyed, or the reasons for the defect in registration of the owner. The applicant shall execute an affidavit stating that the facts alleged in it are true and that no material fact has been withheld.

If the police department finds that the application is executed in proper form, and shows that the motor vehicle has been abandoned upon the property of the applicant or if it shows that the motor vehicle is not abandoned but that the applicant appears to be the rightful owner, the police department shall follow the notification procedures set forth in §

31-42-3

.

If the abandoned motor vehicle is not reclaimed in accordance with §

31-42-3

, the police department shall give the applicant a certificate of authority to sell the motor vehicle to any demolisher for demolition, wrecking, or dismantling. The demolisher shall accept the certificate in lieu of the registration of the motor vehicle.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter, the general laws of the state of Rhode Island, public laws of the state of Rhode Island, or municipal ordinances, any person, firm, corporation, or unit of government upon whose property or in whose possession is found any abandoned motor vehicle, or any person who is the owner of a motor vehicle whose registration is faulty, lost, or destroyed, may dispose of the motor vehicle to a demolisher without a registration and without notification procedure of §

31-42-3

, if the motor vehicle is over eight (8) years old or has no engine or is otherwise totally inoperable. Any demolisher who purchases or acquires any motor vehicle for the purpose of demolition and removal may demolish it on the premises where they are located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1.

31-42-8.
Duties of demolishers.

Any demolisher who purchases or otherwise acquires a motor vehicle for purposes of wrecking, dismantling, or demolition shall not be required to obtain a registration for the motor vehicle in his or her own name. After the motor vehicle has been demolished, processed, or changed so that it physically is no longer a motor vehicle, the demolisher shall surrender for cancellation the registration or auction sales receipt. The state division of motor vehicles shall issue any forms, rules, and regulations governing the surrender of auction sales receipts and registrations that are appropriate.

A demolisher shall keep an accurate and complete record of all motor vehicles purchased or received by the demolisher in the course of his or her business. These records shall contain the name and address of the person from whom the motor vehicle was purchased or received and the date when the purchases or receipts occurred. The records shall be open for inspection by any police department at any time during normal business hours. Any record required by this section shall be kept by the demolisher for at least one year after the transaction to which it applies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 234, § 1.

31-42-9.
Unidentifiable motor vehicles and/or parts.

Notwithstanding the age of a motor vehicle and/or part from which all identifying numbers have been removed so that the identity of the motor vehicle and/or part and its owner cannot be determined, the motor vehicle and/or part shall be subject to a forfeiture hearing before a judge sitting in the district court. After this hearing, the motor vehicle and/or part shall be forfeited to the unit of government that recovered it. The court may also order the division of motor vehicles to issue a special vehicle identification number and an appropriate title certificate for a forfeited motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 12; P.L. 1984, ch. 263, § 1.

31-42-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 191, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 2, effective July 12, 1994.

31-42-11.
Penalties — Costs.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter regarding abandoned motor vehicles on private property, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500). In addition, the violator shall be responsible for all costs relating to the approval and disposal of the abandoned motor vehicle paid by the private property owner or local municipality.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 236, § 1.

31-42-12.
City of Pawtucket — Designee.

In the city of Pawtucket, the police department or its designee shall have the authority to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 80, § 1.